Illinois, session 104th, HB3403.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Veterans Bill of Rights Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Department" means the Department of Veterans' Affairs.8    "EMS personnel" has the same meaning provided in Section 93.5 of the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act.10    "Public institution of higher education" has the same 11meaning provided in Section 10 of the Illinois Prepaid Tuition 12Act. 13    Section 10. Loans to veteran business concerns; monthly 14reports.15    (a) The Department may target any loans granted by the 16Department toward small business concerns owned and controlled 17by veterans or service-disabled veterans, with a goal of 7% of 18annual loaned funds reaching such businesses.19    (b) The Department shall produce monthly electronic 20reports of workforce need projections by industry, job type, 21geography, and credentials needed. The report shall include a 22comparison of workforce needs to existing and projected   HB3403- 2 -LRB104 10702 KTG 20781 b1workforce and credential availability in Illinois, a list of 2top in-demand industries, job types, and credentials by 3geographic area, and a mapping of which in-demand job titles 4and credentials would leverage skills, experience, and 5credentials possessed by veterans. The Department shall 6forward the report monthly to appropriate military 7out-placement offices, education centers, nonprofit programs, 8and any State agencies working to connect veterans with jobs. 9    Section 15. Recognition of military training and 10experience.11    (a) The Department shall take all necessary steps to 12annually increase the number of veterans taking advantage of 13the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration's Military 14Skills Test Waiver Program. These steps shall include, but are 15not limited to, ensuring information on the Program is 16accessible on the Department's website, coordinating with 17military placement and training programs, including, but not 18limited to, the Credentialing Opportunities On-Line program, 19and disseminating information on the Program to veterans with 20relevant experience who are newly located or locating in 21Illinois.22    (b) The Department of Public Health shall immediately 23review all licensing practices and take all necessary and 24appropriate steps to increase recognition of military training 25and experience toward licensing of EMS personnel. Within one   HB3403- 3 -LRB104 10702 KTG 20781 b1year after the effective date of this Act, the Department of 2Public Health shall report to the General Assembly any 3additional steps that may require legislation and request that 4the General Assembly pass that legislation.5    (c) The Department of Financial and Professional 6Regulation shall review all State licenses for which military 7service members may have relevant training or experience and, 8within one year after the effective date of this Act, produce a 9report recommending steps that can be taken to increase 10recognition of military training and experience toward 11licensing. As soon as practicable, but by no later than one 12year after issuance of the report, the Department of Financial 13and Professional Regulation shall then take any steps 14identified in the report that can be taken without further 15legislation and shall report to the General Assembly annually 16to request it enact any necessary legislation. 17    Section 20. College credit; course registration; students 18called to active duty.19    (a) A veteran who enrolls as a student in good standing at 20a public institution of higher education shall upon 21application be granted academic credits without limitation 22toward his or her degree for completion of courses that were 23part of the veteran's military training or service if the 24completed courses meet the standards of the American Council 25on Education, or its equivalent, for the awarding of academic   HB3403- 4 -LRB104 10702 KTG 20781 b1credits. No fee, tuition, or other charge shall be assessed 2against a veteran who qualifies for academic credit under this 3subsection.4    (b) A public institution of higher education that offers 5an early course registration period for any segment of the 6student population shall have a process in place to offer 7early course registration to students who are veterans or 8National Guard members. A veteran with no previous college 9experience shall be permitted to file applications up to the 10end of registration and begin classes pending completion of 11his or her application and provision of supporting documents.12    (c) A student who is called to active duty in the armed 13forces of the United States after having attended a public 14institution of higher education regularly for 13 weeks or 15more, or having completed 85% of the term's work through 16acceleration, shall be given full credit for each course in 17which he or she has a grade of C or better. A student called to 18active duty who does not meet attendance requirements 19sufficient to earn a grade shall be entitled to a 100% refund 20of tuition and fees. Upon a veteran's return from active duty, 21he or she may register after normal registration periods end 22without late fees or other penalties.23    (d) A public institution of higher education shall adopt 24any and all procedures that are necessary to fully implement 25this Section.   HB3403- 5 -LRB104 10702 KTG 20781 b1    Section 25. Training programs. The Department of Commerce 2and Economic Opportunity shall annually review apprentice, 3training, and other vocational programs focused on providing 4job training and placement to returning military service 5members and veterans. The annual review shall evaluate the 6costs and results and recommend programs for expansion using 7State funding, including, but not limited to, an estimate of 8future returns to the State of improved outcomes from the 9expansion of programs. The Department of Commerce and Economic 10Opportunity shall provide an annual report to the General 11Assembly and Governor on January 1 of each year for 5 years 12after the effective date of this Act, to be used by the General 13Assembly to inform annual budget decisions. 14    Section 30. Access to health care.15    (a) The Department shall develop and operate veteran 16health navigator services to increase access to health care 17coverage and services. The Department shall identify, train, 18and deploy veteran health navigators who have direct knowledge 19of the veteran communities they serve. Leveraging existing 20resources and structures where veterans and their families are 21likely to be found, the veteran health navigators shall:22        (1) help identify all federal and other health 23    benefits, coverage, and services available to veterans and 24    their families; and25        (2) coordinate with relevant departments, health care   HB3403- 6 -LRB104 10702 KTG 20781 b1    providers, and health insurance programs to help veterans 2    and their beneficiaries apply for coverage under such 3    programs, including helping veterans overcome barriers 4    within the health care system to ensure enrollment in 5    health plans and effective delivery and coordination of 6    health services.7    (b) Using the veteran health services and navigators 8described in subsection (a) as a source of information about 9the unique needs, coverage, and treatment gaps faced by 10veterans and their families, the Department shall examine all 11existing programs designed to increase access to affordable, 12quality health care and evaluate whether the needs of veterans 13and their families are met by those programs or whether 14further coordination with the veteran health navigators or 15other steps would better meet the needs of veterans and their 16families. The Department shall then produce a report of its 17findings, recommendations, and any additional legislative or 18budget action it recommends, deliver that report to the 19General Assembly and the Governor, and release it to the news 20media.21    (c) The Department shall prepare a report showing the 22impacts that Medicaid expansion has had to date for the 23community of veterans and their families in Illinois, 24including any recommendations for better including or serving 25veterans and their families in that expansion. The Department 26shall deliver that report to the General Assembly and the   HB3403- 7 -LRB104 10702 KTG 20781 b1Governor and release it to the news media. 2    Section 35. Suicide prevention.3    (a) The Department shall ensure that access to mental 4health coverage, services, and treatment is included as a full 5focus stream of the veteran health navigator services 6described in subsection (a) of Section 30, and that veteran 7health navigators help identify all federal and other mental 8health benefits, coverage, and services available to veterans 9and their families, including, but not limited to, those 10relating to post-traumatic stress disorder, depression, and 11suicide prevention.12    (b) In coordination with local, State, and federal 13governmental agencies, and in consultation with nonprofits, 14the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, localities, 15municipalities that have effective prevention and treatment 16systems for mental health, and service providers such as 17Veterans Affairs medical centers, the Department shall develop 18and implement a strategy to reduce barriers to access to 19mental health services and treatment for veterans and their 20families. The Department shall develop the strategy using 21methods including, but not limited to, the following:22        (1) Identifying structural and logistical barriers to 23    accessing treatment, including, but not limited to, 24    perceived stigma, long travel distances to receive care, 25    and any other barriers. The Department shall create an   HB3403- 8 -LRB104 10702 KTG 20781 b1    annual report on the barriers, which shall be delivered to 2    the General Assembly and the Governor and made available 3    on the Department's website.4        (2) Resolving all barriers identified in paragraph (1) 5    that can be resolved without legislative or budgetary 6    action, including, but not limited to, the following:7            (A) increased coordination between State agencies, 8        nonprofit providers, and the federal government;9            (B) application for and use of private and federal 10        grants; and11            (C) any other actions.12        (3) Reporting annually to the General Assembly and the 13    Governor and making available on the Department's website 14    any additional legislative or budgetary steps that would 15    resolve the barriers identified in paragraph (1) that have 16    not been resolved by the steps taken in paragraph (2).17    (c) In coordination with local, State, and federal 18governmental agencies, and in consultation with nonprofits, 19the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, localities, cities 20that have effective prevention and treatment systems for 21mental health, and service providers such as Veterans Affairs 22medical centers, the Department shall enhance and strengthen 23suicide prevention programs in keeping with proven best 24practices and research, using methods including, but not 25limited to, the following:26        (1) Identifying and applying for federal and private   HB3403- 9 -LRB104 10702 KTG 20781 b1    grants focused on veteran suicide prevention.2        (2) Coordinating local, State, federal, and nonprofit 3    programs that include community-based approaches for 4    at-risk veterans and veterans at large.5        (3) Providing technical assistance to communities to 6    develop strategic plans to reduce veteran suicide, 7    including, but not limited to, coordination and 8    participation by local leaders, faith communities, 9    schools, workplaces, and other stakeholders.10        (4) Evaluating community strategic plans within 11    Illinois and disseminating methods and best practices to 12    optimize the impact of efforts by all partners and 13    stakeholders.14    (d) The Department shall create a centralized provider 15database, identifying, by region, mental health providers with 16the expertise and ability to assist veterans and their 17families. The database shall highlight providers with training 18or experience in the prevention and treatment of veteran 19suicide.20    (e) Using existing resources, and incorporating best 21practices and research from the U.S. Department of Veterans 22Affairs and State and nonprofit service providers in Illinois, 23the Department shall develop a continuing education course for 24mental health providers in Illinois to obtain expertise in 25veteran suicide assessment, prevention, treatment, and risk 26management and shall make the program available for free to   HB3403- 10 -LRB104 10702 KTG 20781 b1providers in regions of the State lacking sufficiently trained 2providers, as determined by the database created under 3subsection (d).4    (f) Using existing or appropriated resources, the 5Department shall identify evidence-based best practices to 6increase awareness of any veteran suicide prevention hotline 7and other crisis resources in Illinois or nationally with 8proven effectiveness in reducing veteran suicide. 9    Section 40. Strategy for ending veteran homelessness.10    (a) In coordination with local, State, and federal 11governmental agencies and nonprofits, and in consultation with 12states and municipalities that have achieved an end to veteran 13homelessness, the Department shall develop and implement a 14strategy to end veteran homelessness within 3 years. The 15strategy shall include, but is not limited to, the following:16        (1) Coordinated community outreach and a common 17    assessment tool.18        (2) A community-wide, comprehensive list of veterans 19    by name who are experiencing homelessness, prioritized 20    based on vulnerability.21        (3) Data-sharing among all relevant providers, State 22    agencies, and Veterans Affairs medical centers.23        (4) Increased coordination and streamlined processes 24    for appropriate housing placements.25        (5) Connecting veterans experiencing homelessness to   HB3403- 11 -LRB104 10702 KTG 20781 b1    health, mental health, employment, and training resources 2    through the services described in this Act.3        (6) A commitment to housing first principles, as 4    propounded by the National Alliance to End Homelessness.5        (7) Identification of and application for funding, as 6    needed, from private and foundation sources and other 7    partners.8    (b) In this Section, "end veteran homelessness" means an 9outcome meeting the criteria identified and most recently 10released by the United States Interagency Council on 11Homelessness.